Maryland, session 2026, HB0403.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
4–101.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0403*

HOUSE BILL 403
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Applicant” means a person or governmental unit that asks to inspect a public
record.
(d) “Custodian” means:
(1) the official custodian; or
(2) any other authorized individual who has physical custody and control
of a public record.
(f) “Official custodian” means an officer or employee of the State or of a political
subdivision who is responsible for keeping a public record, whether or not the officer or
employee has physical custody and control of the public record.
(g) “Person in interest” means:
(1) a person or governmental unit that is the subject of a public record or a
designee of the person or governmental unit;
(2) if the person has a legal disability, the parent or legal representative of
the person; or
(3) as to requests for correction of certificates of death under § 5–310(d)(2)
of the Health – General Article, the spouse, adult child, parent, adult sibling, grandparent,
or guardian of the person of the deceased at the time of the deceased’s death.
4–305.1.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A FINAL DECREE IN A DIVORCE
PROCEEDING.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A
CUSTODIAN SHALL DENY INSPECTION OF A RECORD PERTAINING TO A DIVORCE
PROCEEDING, INCLUDING:
(1) AN APPLICATION FOR DIVORCE;
(2) A FINANCIAL RECORD SUBMITTED AS PART OF A DIVORCE
PROCEEDING;
(3) A RECORD OF A DIVORCE SETTLEMENT; AND
(4) A CUSTODY ORDER.

HOUSE BILL 403 3
(C) A CUSTODIAN SHALL RELEASE A RECORD PERTAINING TO A DIVORCE
PROCEEDING TO AN APPLICANT WHO:
(1) IS A PERSON IN INTEREST;
(2) IS A LAWYER REPRESENTING A PERSON IN INTEREST; OR
(3) HAS BEEN AUTHORIZED UNDER A COURT ORDER TO INSPECT THE
RECORD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.